Hawaii statutes.
[§11-364] Excess contribution;
return; escheat. (a) Any candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate
committee that receives in the aggregate more than the applicable contribution
limit in section 11-357, 11-358, 11-359, or 11-360 shall return any excess
contribution to the contributor within thirty days of receipt of the excess
contribution. Any excess contribution not returned to the contributor within
thirty days shall escheat to the Hawaii election campaign fund.

(b) A candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate
committee that complies with this section prior to the initiation of
administrative action shall not be subject to any fine under section 11-410. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next